District of Columbia statutes.
1-325.321

Definitions.

For the purposes of this part, the term:

(1)

“Fund” means the Teen Pregnancy Prevention Fund established in § 1-325.322.

(2)

“Grant-managing entity” means the DC Campaign to Prevent Teen Pregnancy, as authorized by § 1-325.325.

Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 5142, 61 DCR 9990

History

For temporary (90 days) addition of this part, see § 5152-5156 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this part, see §§ 5142-5147 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this part, see §§ 5142-5147 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).

Emergency Legislation